Hawaii statutes.
§636-3 Judgment, orders, decrees;
lien when. Any money judgment, order, or decree of a state court or the
United States District Court for the District of Hawaii shall be a lien upon
real property when a copy thereof, certified as correct by a clerk of the court
where it is entered, is recorded in the bureau of conveyances. No such lien
shall continue beyond the length of time the underlying judgment, order, or
decree is in force. Except as otherwise provided, every judgment shall contain
or have endorsed on it the Hawaii tax identification number, the federal
employer identification number, or the last four digits only of the social
security number for persons, corporations, partnerships, or other entities
against whom the judgment, order, or decree is rendered. If the debtor has no
social security number, Hawaii tax identification number, or federal employer
identification number, or if that information is not in the possession of the
party seeking registration of the judgment, order, or decree, the judgment,
order, or decree shall be accompanied by a certificate that provides that the
information does not exist or is not in the possession of the party seeking
recordation of the judgment. Failure to disclose or disclosure of an incorrect
social security number, Hawaii tax identification number, or federal employer
identification number shall not in any way adversely affect or impair the lien
created upon recordation of the judgment, order, or decree. When any judgment,
order, or decree is fully paid, the creditor or the creditor's attorney of
record in the action, at the expense of the debtor, shall execute, acknowledge,
and deliver to the debtor a satisfaction thereof, which may be recorded in the
bureau. Every satisfaction or assignment of judgment, order, or decree shall
contain a reference to the book and page or document number of the registration
of the original judgment. The recording fees for a judgment, order, or decree
and for each assignment or satisfaction of judgment, order, or decree shall be
as provided by section 502-25.

In the case of registered land, sections
501-241 to 501-248 and part II of chapter 501 shall govern.

The party seeking to record or register a
judgment, order, or decree shall redact the first five digits of any social
security number by blocking the numbers out on the copy of the judgment, order,
or decree to be recorded or registered. [L 1913, c 32, §1; RL 1925, §2435; am L
1929, c 27, §2; RL 1935, §4133; am L 1939, c 15, §1; RL 1945, §10134; am L
1947, c 158, §2; RL 1955, §232-4; am L 1966, c 33, §6; HRS §636-3; am L 1972, c
89, §3(a); gen ch 1985; am L 1989, c 47, §16; am L 1990, c 203, §5; am L 1998,
c 219, §15; am L 2006, c 155, §1; am L 2008, c 86, §4; am L 2009, c 5, §4 and c
120, §15; am L 2013, c 119, §10; am L 2014, c 19, §4]

Cross References

Recordation, see §502-31.5.

Rules of Court

Recordation, see RLC rule 62(e).

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next